California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
If the lot has not been reconditioned or the deficiency otherwise corrected so as to bring it into compliance within the time specified in the notice, the enforcing officer shall cause a copy of the notice to be served upon all persons that are designated in writing by the person in possession of the lot to be the owner or to claim an interest in it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43037.

Any notice which is required by this article may be served personally or by mail which is addressed to the person to be served at his last known address.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43038.

The enforcing officer, with the written consent of all such persons served, may destroy such lot or otherwise abate the nuisance. If any such person fails or refuses to give such consent, the enforcing officer shall proceed as provided in Section 43039 or 43040.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43039.

If the lot which is held is perishable or subject to rapid deterioration, the enforcing officer may file a verified petition in superior court to destroy the lot or otherwise abate the nuisance. The petition shall show the condition of the lot, that the lot is situated within the county, that the lot is held, and that notice of noncompliance has been served as provided in this article. The court may thereupon order that the lot be forthwith destroyed or the nuisance otherwise abated as set forth in the order. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

43040.

If the lot which is held is not perishable or subject to rapid deterioration, the enforcing officer shall immediately report the condition of the lot to the director. Within five days from the receipt of such report, the director may file a petition in the superior court in the county where the lot is situated for an order to show cause, returnable in five days, why the lot should not be abated.

The owner or person in possession on his own motion within five days from the expiration of the time specified in the notice of noncompliance may file a petition in such court for an order to show cause, returnable in five days, why the lot should not be released to petitioner and any warning tags previously affixed removed from it. Final determination by the court in either case shall be within a period of not to exceed 20 days from the date such petition was filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43041.

The court may enter judgment ordering that the lot be condemned and destroyed in the manner which is directed by the court or relabeled, denatured, or otherwise processed, or sold or released upon such conditions as the court in its discretion may impose to insure that the nuisance will be abated. If the lot is sold by order of the court, the costs of storage, handling, and reconditioning or disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance, if any, paid into court for the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. County Fees [43061. - 43065.]

43061.

(a) The board of supervisors of a county may require registration and establish a schedule of annual registration fees to be paid by any person who acts as a wholesaler of fresh fruit and vegetables under any license required under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) of Division 20, and who maintains an office or salesroom or conducts that business in the county.

(b) Any funds derived under this section shall be used only for the enforcement of wholesale inspections of fruits and vegetables pursuant to this division.

(c) The maximum fee
 that may be established pursuant to this section shall be determined at the discretion of the board of supervisors of a county and shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   (SB 701)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

43062.

Section 43061 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any person acting as a retail merchant, as that term is described in Section 56161, or any person acting as a producer, as that term is defined in Section 56110.

(b) Any person who only handles products other than fruits and vegetables, as defined in Section 42510.

(c) Any person that is licensed only as a broker, as defined in Section 56103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.   (SB 701)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

43063.

“Costs,” as used in this article, means direct costs only in the administration and enforcement of this division at places other than places operated by retail merchants, as that term is described in Section 56161.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43064.

It is unlawful for any person to operate as a wholesaler of fruits and vegetables under this division in any county with registration as established pursuant to this article unless that person is registered and has paid the required fee pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43065.

(a) A fruit and vegetable wholesaler registration issued pursuant to Section 43061 may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the commissioner for any violation of either this division or a regulation issued pursuant to this division.

(b) Procedures for the refusal, suspension, or revocation of a registration shall be the same as those contained in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. California-Grown Seal [43100. - 43100.]

43100.

(a) The terms “California grown,” “California-grown,” and similar terms with identical connotations shall be used in the labeling or advertising of agricultural products as follows:

(1) The terms “California grown,” “California-grown,” and similar terms with identical connotations may be used for marketing, advertising, or promotional purposes only to identify food or agricultural products that have been produced in the state or harvested in its surface or coastal waters.

(2) The secretary may adopt guidelines, rules, and regulations to further define acceptable uses of the terms “California
 grown,” “California-grown,” and similar terms with identical connotations and to prevent any misleading use of the terms.

(b) A false, deceptive, or misleading use of the term “California grown,” “California-grown,” or similar terms with identical connotations, or of any seals or other identities officially adopted by the department in connection with these terms, or any unwarranted use of these items or terms, shall be subject to the provisions and penalties set forth in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 890) of Part 1 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Exempt Fruits, Nuts, and Vegetables [43331. - 43333.]



  ARTICLE 4. Violations [43331. - 43333.]

43331.

It is unlawful for any person to use or dispose of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables for which a permit has been issued, in any manner or for any purpose except the manner or purpose for which such permit was issued, unless he is specifically authorized in writing to do so by an enforcing officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43332.

It is unlawful for any person who has been issued a valid permit pursuant to regulations established by the director to sell, buy, receive, transport, deliver, or cause to be transported, or for any person to transport unless such a permit accompanies the vehicle which is transporting, any fruits, nuts, or vegetables which are exempt from the standards which are established in this chapter, except a person that comes within one of the following classes:

(a) A common carrier which operates over a regular route or between fixed termini and transports any such fruits, nuts, or vegetables in good faith and in accordance with its duties as a common carrier.

(b) A person that is transporting fruits, nuts, or vegetables from the orchard or field where they were produced to a packing plant within the state for first processing, grading, or packing.

(c) A person that is transporting fruits, nuts, or vegetables in accordance with the terms of a disposal order which is duly issued pursuant to Section 42881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 298, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

43333.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for transportation or delivery any fruits, nuts, or vegetables which fail to conform to the standards of this division to any person that is required to have a permit pursuant to Section 43332 unless such person has such permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Containers [43571. - 43571.]



  ARTICLE 4.5. Out-of-State Processing [43571. - 43571.]

43571.

The provisions of this division shall not be construed to prohibit the shipment, transportation, or movement of melons and vegetables in field bins or bulk out of this state into any adjoining states within the United States, if all of the following exist:

(a) Melons and vegetables are grown in this state and adequate facilities are available in the adjoining state to handle and pack the melons and
 vegetables as set forth in this division.

(b) The melons and vegetables are not trimmed or vacuum cooled in California prior to packing.

(c) The activities are carried out on behalf of the grower or shipper as part of a continuous activity of harvesting, wrapping, packing, processing, cooling, vacuum cooling, applying of controlled atmosphere, or otherwise preparing melons and vegetables for shipment and sale in accordance with the requirements of this division.

(d) The grower or shipper has obtained a permit from the secretary authorizing
 the movement into an adjoining state and has complied with
 the rules and regulations, including those requiring inspection in the state of destination, as the secretary may require.

(e) The secretary has obtained verification from the state officials of the destination state satisfactory to the secretary that the melons and vegetables will be handled and packed in
 accordance with the requirements specified in the permit.
 A permit shall be valid for a period not to exceed 180 days and may be renewed for successive 180-day periods. A permit shall be canceled for failure to meet the requirements specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (AB 1825)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Avocados [44971. - 45042.]



  ARTICLE 1. Container Certification and Fees [44971. - 44988.]

44971.

(a) The handling and marketing of avocados is affected with the public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted for the protection of the avocado industry and for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(b) Avocados produced in this state which are being prepared for market shall be certified as complying with the maturity and quality provisions established by regulations of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.5.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44972.

If the director finds that avocados which are being prepared for market conform to the applicable standards, he shall so indicate by an official stamp placed on each flat, carton, or any other container by, or under the supervision of, the inspector, stating that the applicable standards have been complied with on the date of pack. Except as provided in this chapter or regulations of the director, it is unlawful for any person to ship to market or otherwise place into the channels of trade any container of avocados which does not bear the official stamp placed thereon pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 2.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44973.

It is unlawful for any person, including a grower, packer, handler, or retailer to pack, handle, or sell any lot of avocados which are not in compliance with maturity and quality standards established through regulations of the director.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 3.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44974.

(a) Any violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or regulations of the director established pursuant to this chapter is unlawful and shall constitute grounds for injunctive relief and the imposition of civil penalties of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. This action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction by the director or district attorney of a county in which a violation or threatened violation occurred. The California Avocado Commission and the Avocado Inspection Committee are also authorized to bring an action for injunctive relief on grounds provided for in this chapter. In bringing this action, the commission or committee is not required to allege facts necessary to show or which tend to show lack of an adequate remedy at law, or which show or tend to show irreparable damage or loss. Prior to commencing this action, the commission shall allow the director the opportunity to bring an action for injunctive relief following the same procedure as provided for the committee in Section 45015. Notwithstanding the director’s decision on whether or not to bring an action for injunctive relief, nothing in this section or in Section 45015 shall be construed as preventing the commission from bringing an action for injunctive relief.

(b) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), and except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 42945, 42948, 42949, and 44986, a violation of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with the inspection or certification requirements of this chapter. A violation is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars (5,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(d) Each violation or threatened violation involving a lot of avocados shall be treated as a separate violation. Any number of defendants in any number of counties may be joined in one action even though the violations or threatened violations are not the same, and jurisdiction for the action may be established in any county in which any of the violations or threatened violations occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

44975.

(a) Each handler of avocados shall pay to the director an inspection and certification fee each month. The fee shall be based on the number of pounds certified as determined by the director. However, in no event shall the fee be greater than twenty-five cents ($0.25) per hundredweight of pounds prepared for market. The number of pounds certified shall be reported monthly to the director, and these reports shall include all information required by the director. The fee required by this section shall be paid no later than the 10th day of the month following the month for which the fee is payable. Any handler who fails to pay the fee within the time required shall pay the director a penalty of 10 percent of the amount determined to be due, and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance. The director may adjust the fee from time to time and reduce it whenever he or she finds the cost of administering this article may be defrayed from revenue derived from lower fees.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), whenever the fees derived from pounds certified do not cover the cost of inspection, the director may establish hourly and mileage rates for inspection and certification of avocados based upon the cost of providing that inspection and certification. However, alternatively, a handler may present his or her avocados for inspection and certification on a date, time, and location specified by the director and pay the fees charged pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44976.

The moneys which are received pursuant to this chapter shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, payments to the county agricultural commissioners and to institutions of scientific research for improving the inspection and certification methods required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44977.

The director may adopt such regulations as he determines are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 44976 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 8.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44978.

The director may enter into an agreement with any county agricultural commissioner for assistance in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 44977 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 9.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44979.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the director adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 10.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44980.

Every person who prepares avocados grown in this state for market shall report to the director, prior to this preparation, the date and time these avocados will be prepared for market. Avocados and their containers shall be made available for inspection and certification at the time of preparation for market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 11.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44980.5.

The director may prescribe a higher frequency of inspection or surveillance of a person or firm handling or packing avocados for sale, if the director determines either that repeated violations of this chapter have occurred, or has probable cause to believe that a violation is about to occur or has occurred. The director may charge the person or firm the costs of performing the higher frequency of inspection or surveillance necessary to prevent violations of either this chapter or regulations of the director. Costs shall be based upon the approximate cost of the service which is rendered. This charge shall be in addition to the fee provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 44975 and shall be paid in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 44975. Any person assessed a cost under this subdivision shall have the right of appeal to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1301, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44981.

(a) Inspection to determine maturity of avocados may be performed prior to preparation for market, either at roadside by the orchard or enroute to or at the first point of packing. The results shall serve as a cause for placing all or any sizes of the avocados under a disposal order for testing after grading or packing when the oil content is less than required by this chapter.

(b) Any lot of avocados suspected as being in noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be placed under a disposal order for control to a specified location in this state for disposition.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring inspection prior to preparation for market.

(d) For purposes of this section “roadside inspection” means an inspection conducted for quality and maturity standards at or near the place of production, or on the transporting vehicle while the product is in transit, or at a place where avocados are being stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 12.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44982.

Each handler of avocados shall prepare and retain for two years up-to-date records of daily transactions. These records shall contain, but not be limited to, the amount of avocados received, shipped, packed, transported, dumped, and on hand at the end of each day. Amounts for each transaction shall be kept by variety in pounds, number of containers by container type, and size when the avocados have been segregated by size.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1301, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44983.

It shall be unlawful for any person to falsify or cause to be falsified the record or information required to be kept pursuant to Section 44982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 14.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44984.

Any handler, packer, shipper, transporter, or grower of avocados who is required to keep records pursuant to Section 44982, shall allow the director or his or her authorized agent to examine or inspect these records during normal business hours and any other time when avocados are being packed or otherwise handled in a manner subject to the provisions of this chapter.

All records maintained pursuant to Section 44982 and made available to the director, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in an administrative or judicial proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 15.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44985.

The director may authorize the issuance and use of, or revocation of, a certification stamp as provided for under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 16.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44986.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Use a certification stamp for certifying containers or lots of avocados for other than containers previously inspected by the director’s authorized agent and designated to be stamped.

(b) Use the stamp at any time or in any manner other than provided in this chapter or contrary to the directions of the director’s authorized agent authorizing the use of the stamp.

(c) Refuse to surrender, each day after use, or upon demand of the director’s authorized agent, any certification stamp authorized to be used.

(d) Counterfeit or alter or use any counterfeit or altered certification stamp.

(e) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

44987.

In lieu of the certification stamp required under this chapter, the director may authorize issuance of a permit to any person or firm engaged in preparing avocados for market on an intermittent basis, or any other person on an emergency basis. The permit shall have an assigned number, and the containers of avocados for which the permit is issued shall be printed or labeled with the words “avocado permit” immediately followed by the number designation. Except on an emergency basis, a permit shall not be issued for more than ten containers and not more than four permits may be issued to any person, firm, or family of the same household during the calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 18.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44988.

(a) The director may promulgate regulations which establish maturity standards governing the time at which avocados may be harvested. The regulations shall include minimum maturity requirements for the various varieties of avocados produced. The standards may be established in the form of a variable maturity range, which shall include a system for determination of avocado maturity. This system shall prescribe criteria and a method by which the dates of harvest and required maturity level, as measured by a recognized method of measuring avocado maturity, may be established by the director during each harvest season.

(b) The director may modify these requirements, from time to time, in order to insure that the quality standards for marketing avocados are maintained. These modifications shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1301, Sec. 5.   Effective September 23, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Avocado Inspection Committee [45011. - 45021.]

45011.

There is in the department the Avocado Inspection Committee, which consists of six members. The director shall appoint three members and one alternate member who shall be producers of avocados and three members and one alternate member who shall be representatives of handlers engaged in the packing of avocados from a list of nominees provided by the California Avocado Commission. The director may appoint one additional member of the committee, who shall be a public member. The committee shall meet on the direction of the director or when requested by a majority of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 19.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45012.

Upon the director’s request, the committee shall submit to the director the name of a natural person, who shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor nor financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the director as a public member of the committee. The director may appoint this nominee as the public member on the committee. If the nominee is unsatisfactory to the director, the committee shall continue to submit nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the committee shall be filled in the same manner as used in initially selecting the public member. The public member of the committee shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 19.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45013.

The committee member’s term of office shall be two years. Appointment of the first members shall be made so that the terms of office of three members shall expire at the end of one year and three at the end of two years. Thereafter, appointment shall be for full two-year terms. Each committee member shall be limited to four consecutive terms in office. Any vacancies which occur during an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired term following the same procedure used for initially nominating and appointing members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 19.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45014.

The committee shall be advisory to the director, and to the California Avocado Commission if it decides to act pursuant to Section 67095, on all matters pertaining to this chapter, shall review all proposed regulations relating to this chapter, and shall make recommendations concerning the inspection and certification services under this chapter, including, but not limited to, the annual budget and fees necessary to provide adequate inspection and certification services; inspection procedures; training and supervision of inspectors; and enforcement actions, including the imposition of any fees and costs for inspection and surveillance provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 44975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 953, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

45015.

(a) In adopting regulations pursuant to this chapter, the director shall accept the recommendations of the advisory committee whenever he or she finds them to be practicable and in the interests of the avocado industry and the public. The director shall provide the committee with a written statement of reasons within 15 working days, whenever he or she does not accept the committee recommendation.

(b) In the case of recommendations involving enforcement actions based on actual or alleged violations of this chapter, the committee by majority vote may bring an action for injunctive relief as provided for in Section 44974, retain private legal counsel for this purpose, and use fees provided for under this chapter to pay all reasonable fees and costs incurred in bringing the action. However, legal fees and costs incurred in each separate action which exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall not be paid unless concurred in by the director. Prior to commencing this action, the committee must review all available information, recommend specific enforcement action to the director, and allow the director the opportunity to respond as provided for in this section. Notwithstanding the director’s response, nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the committee from bringing an action for injunctive relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 19.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45016.

Committee members shall be compensated for all reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, as determined by the committee and concurred in by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 141, Sec. 19.   Effective March 31, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45017.

(a) The committee may recommend to the director that avocados subject to weather-related damage not be harvested for a specified period of time and the director may restrict harvesting based on that recommendation.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations which govern the committee’s recommendations made pursuant to this section. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The maximum period of time for which harvesting may not be done.

(2) The geographical region for which the recommendation would be made.

(3) The minimum level of damage required in order to make a recommendation.

(4) The manner in which affected growers and handlers are to be notified of the decision of the director.

(5) A definition of weather-related damage.

(6) Procedures and criteria for issuing exemptions to growers from the decision of the director made pursuant to this section and for the handling of avocados from an exempt grower.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1013, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45021.

(a) The requirements specified in this chapter, including, but not limited to, the setting, collection, and handling of inspection and certification fees and other costs of service, inspection frequency and procedures, hiring, training, and supervision of inspectors and other necessary personnel, use and revocation of an official stamp or permit, reports prior to preparing avocados for market, and recordkeeping with respect to avocados, may be conducted by the California Avocado Commission instead of the director, if authorized in the manner specified in Section 67095.

(b) The enforcement and regulatory authority of the director which is specified in this chapter shall remain in full force and effect. However, the authority of the director shall be exercised in consultation and cooperation with the commission during any period in which the commission exercises its authority pursuant to Section 67095.

(c) All expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties under subdivision (b) shall be reimbursed from fees collected under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 953, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proof of Ownership [45031. - 45042.]

45031.

Every person who is in possession of over 25 pounds of avocados that are produced in this state shall possess a record of proof of ownership of the avocados.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 487, Sec. 3.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

45032.

(a) Upon probable cause to believe any avocados regulated by this chapter are in unlawful possession, proof of ownership shall be made available for inspection upon the request of the director or any peace officer. If the director has probable cause to believe that any avocados regulated by this chapter are in unlawful possession, he or she may request a peace officer to stop the vehicle pursuant to Section 45037 for inspection.

(b) The proof of ownership record shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and signature of the seller or the seller’s authorized representative.

(2) The name and address of the buyer or consignee if not sold.

(3) The common name “avocados” and the quantity of the avocados.

(4) The date of transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45033.

A bill of lading, bill of sale, certified farmers certificate, any data obtainable by electronic transmission which is accessible to a common carrier, or a similar type document shall be considered proof of ownership for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45034.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly falsify or cause to be falsified any information in a record intended to show proof of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45035.

A copy of the proof of ownership record shall be retained by the buyer and seller for a period of one year after sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45036.

This article does not apply to avocados transported and accompanied by a valid permit, disposal order, or certificate issued by the director or the commissioner for any reason other than to comply with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45037.

Upon probable cause to believe avocados regulated by this chapter are being unlawfully transported, any peace officer may stop the transporting vehicle and request a record of proof of ownership of the avocados.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45038.

Upon reasonable belief that a person is in unlawful possession of avocados regulated by this chapter, the avocados may be seized by the director or any peace officer and shall be turned over to the custody of the director. The director may hold the commodity on the premises where it was seized until disposed of pursuant to Section 45040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45039.

The director or a peace officer may investigate to ascertain the ownership of any avocados that have been held pursuant to this chapter. If the lawful owner is located, the avocados shall be released to the owner, or his or her agent. The director may require reasonable payment to cover costs incurred in the storing of the avocados, but not to exceed the value of the avocados.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45040.

(a) If for any reason the avocados are not released to the rightful owner after being in the custody of the secretary for 72 hours or, in the case of highly perishable avocados, a shorter period of time that the secretary deems necessary, the secretary may either sell the avocados by private sale at fair grower market value or, after 72 hours from the time of seizure, donate the avocados to a nonprofit charitable organization or an on-campus food pantry serving students enrolled in an institution of public postsecondary education. If donated, the avocados shall not be sold by the receiving party. If sold by the secretary, all of the proceeds derived from the sale of the commodity shall be held by the secretary for a period of not less than six months, during which time the lawful owner of
 the avocados may submit satisfactory proof of ownership and obtain possession of the proceeds. The secretary may require the payment by the owner of an amount sufficient to cover the costs incurred for storage and sale of the avocados, but not to exceed the sale price of the avocados. If, after retention of the proceeds for a period of at least six months, no demand is made or if proof of ownership is not supplied, the secretary shall deposit the proceeds of the sale of the avocados with the California Avocado Commission.

(b) If the avocados are unfit for human consumption, the secretary may destroy them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (AB 2324)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

45041.

(a) Unless otherwise specified, a violation of this article is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) A conviction of a second or subsequent violation of this article is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) A violation of this article is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment, if the retail value of the avocados in violation is in excess of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

45042.
